Ohio, session 136, HB690.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 2903.06, 2903.08, 2903.081, and 2903.13 be amended and section 4511.461 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 2903.06. (A) No person, while operating or participating in the operation of a motor vehicle, motorcycle, utility vehicle, mini-truck, snowmobile, locomotive, watercraft, or aircraft, shall cause the death of another or the unlawful termination of another's pregnancy in any of the following ways: (1) As the proximate result of committing an OVI offense. (2) In one of the following ways: (a) Recklessly; (b) As the proximate result of committing, while operating or participating in the operation of a motor vehicle, utility vehicle, mini-truck, or motorcycle in a construction zone, a reckless operation offense, provided that this division applies only if the person whose death is caused or whose pregnancy is unlawfully terminated is in the construction zone at the time of the offender's commission of the reckless operation offense in the construction zone and does not apply as described in division (F) of this section; (c) As the proximate result of committing a violation of division (C) of section 4511.461 of the Revised Code. (3) In one of the following ways: (a) Negligently; (b) As the proximate result of committing, while operating or participating in the operation of a motor vehicle, utility vehicle, mini-truck, or motorcycle in a construction zone, a speeding offense, provided that this division applies only if the person whose death is caused or whose pregnancy is unlawfully terminated is in the construction zone at the time of the offender's commission of the speeding offense in the construction zone and does not apply as described in division (F) of this section. (4) As the proximate result of committing a violation of any provision of any section contained in Title XLV of the Revised Code that is a minor misdemeanor or of a municipal ordinance that, regardless of the penalty set by ordinance for the violation, is substantially equivalent to any provision of any section contained in Title XLV of the Revised Code that is a minor misdemeanor. (B)(1) Whoever violates division (A)(1) or (2) of this section is guilty of aggravated vehicular homicide and shall be punished as provided in divisions (B)(2) and (3) of this section. (2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (B)(2)(b), (c), or (d) of this section, aggravated vehicular homicide committed in violation of division (A)(1) of this section is a felony of the second degree and the court shall impose a mandatory prison term on the offender as described in division (E) of this section. (b) Except as otherwise provided in division (B)(2)(c) or (d) of this section, aggravated vehicular homicide committed in violation of division (A)(1) of this section is a felony of the first degree, and the court shall impose a mandatory prison term on the offender as described in division (E) of this section, if any of the following apply: (i) At the time of the offense, the offender was driving under a suspension or cancellation imposed under Chapter 4510. or any other provision of the Revised Code or was operating a motor vehicle or motorcycle, did not have a valid driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege, and was not eligible for renewal of the offender's driver's license or commercial driver's license without examination under section 4507.10 of the Revised Code. (ii) The offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one prior OVI offense within the previous twenty years. (iii) The offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one prior traffic-related homicide, manslaughter, or assault offense within the previous twenty years. (c) Except as otherwise provided in division (B)(2)(d) of this section, aggravated vehicular homicide committed in violation of division (A)(1) of this section is a felony of the first degree, and the court shall sentence the offender to a mandatory prison term as provided in section 2929.142 of the Revised Code and described in division (E) of this section if any of the following apply: (i) The offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to two prior OVI offenses within the previous twenty years. (ii) The offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to two prior traffic-related homicide, manslaughter, or assault offenses within the previous twenty years. (iii) The offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to two prior violations of any combination of the offenses listed in division (B)(2)(c)(i) and (ii) of this section within the previous twenty years. (d) Aggravated vehicular homicide committed in violation of division (A)(1) of this section is a felony of the first degree, and the court shall sentence the offender to a mandatory prison term as provided in section 2929.142 of the Revised Code and described in division (E) of this section if any of the following apply: (i) The offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to three or more prior OVI offenses within the previous twenty years. (ii) The offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to three or more prior traffic-related homicide, manslaughter, or assault offenses within the previous twenty years. (iii) The offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to three or more prior violations of any combination of the offenses listed in divisions (B)(2)(d)(i) and (ii) of this section within the previous twenty years. (e) In addition to any other sanctions imposed pursuant to division (B)(2)(a), (b), (c), or (d) of this section for aggravated vehicular homicide committed in violation of division (A)(1) of this section, the court shall impose upon the offender a class one suspension of the offender's driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege as specified in division (A)(1) of section 4510.02 of the Revised Code. Divisions (A)(1) to (3) of section 4510.54 of the Revised Code apply to a suspension imposed under division (B)(2)(e) of this section. (f) Notwithstanding section 2929.18 of the Revised Code, and in addition to any other sanctions imposed pursuant to division (B)(2) of this section for aggravated vehicular homicide committed in violation of division (A)(1) of this section, the court shall impose upon the offender a fine of not more than twenty-five thousand dollars. (3) Except as otherwise provided in this division, aggravated vehicular homicide committed in violation of division (A)(2) of this section is a felony of the third degree. Aggravated vehicular homicide committed in violation of division (A)(2) of this section is a felony of the second degree if, at the time of the offense, the offender was driving under a suspension or cancellation imposed under Chapter 4510. or any other provision of the Revised Code or was operating a motor vehicle or motorcycle, did not have a valid driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege, and was not eligible for renewal of the offender's driver's license or commercial driver's license without examination under section 4507.10 of the Revised Code or if the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of this section or any traffic-related homicide, manslaughter, or assault offense. The court shall impose a mandatory prison term on the offender when required by division (E) of this section. In addition to any other sanctions imposed pursuant to this division for a violation of division (A)(2) of this section, the court shall impose upon the offender a class two suspension of the offender's driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege from the range specified in division (A)(2) of section 4510.02 of the Revised Code or, if the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a traffic-related murder, felonious assault, or attempted murder offense, a class one suspension of the offender's driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege as specified in division (A)(1) of that section. (C) Whoever violates division (A)(3) of this section is guilty of vehicular homicide. Except as otherwise provided in this division, vehicular homicide is a misdemeanor of the first degree. Vehicular homicide committed in violation of division (A)(3) of this section is a felony of the fourth degree if, at the time of the offense, the offender was driving under a suspension or cancellation imposed under Chapter 4510. or any other provision of the Revised Code or was operating a motor vehicle or motorcycle, did not have a valid driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege, and was not eligible for renewal of the offender's driver's license or commercial driver's license without examination under section 4507.10 of the Revised Code or if the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of this section or any traffic-related homicide, manslaughter, or assault offense. The court shall impose a mandatory jail term or a mandatory prison term on the offender when required by division (E) of this section. In addition to any other sanctions imposed pursuant to this division, the court shall impose upon the offender a class four suspension of the offender's driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege from the range specified in division (A)(4) of section 4510.02 of the Revised Code, or, if the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of this section or any traffic-related homicide, manslaughter, or assault offense, a class three suspension of the offender's driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege from the range specified in division (A)(3) of that section, or, if the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a traffic-related murder, felonious assault, or attempted murder offense, a class two suspension of the offender's driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege as specified in division (A)(2) of that section. (D) Whoever violates division (A)(4) of this section is guilty of vehicular manslaughter. Except as otherwise provided in this division, vehicular manslaughter is a misdemeanor of the second degree. Vehicular manslaughter is a misdemeanor of the first degree if, at the time of the offense, the offender was driving under a suspension or cancellation imposed under Chapter 4510. or any other provision of the Revised Code or was operating a motor vehicle or motorcycle, did not have a valid driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege, and was not eligible for renewal of the offender's driver's license or commercial driver's license without examination under section 4507.10 of the Revised Code or if the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of this section or any traffic-related homicide, manslaughter, or assault offense. In addition to any other sanctions imposed pursuant to this division, the court shall impose upon the offender a class six suspension of the offender's driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege from the range specified in division (A)(6) of section 4510.02 of the Revised Code or, if the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of this section, any traffic-related homicide, manslaughter, or assault offense, or a traffic-related murder, felonious assault, or attempted murder offense, a class four suspension of the offender's driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege from the range specified in division (A)(4) of that section. (E)(1) The court shall impose a mandatory prison term on an offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of division (A)(1) of this section. Except as otherwise provided in this division, the mandatory prison term shall be a definite term from the range of prison terms provided in division (A)(1)(b) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code for a felony of the first degree or from division (A)(2)(b) of that section for a felony of the second degree, whichever is applicable, except that if the violation is committed on or after March 22, 2019, the court shall impose as the minimum prison term for the offense a mandatory prison term that is one of the minimum terms prescribed for a felony of the first degree in division (A)(1)(a) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code or one of the terms prescribed for a felony of the second degree in division (A)(2)(a) of that section, whichever is applicable. If division (B)(2)(c) or (d) of this section applies to an offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to the violation of division (A)(1) of this section, the court shall impose the mandatory prison term pursuant to division (A) or (B) of section 2929.142 of the Revised Code, as applicable. The court shall impose a mandatory jail term of at least fifteen days on an offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a misdemeanor violation of division (A)(3)(b) of this section and may impose upon the offender a longer jail term as authorized pursuant to section 2929.24 of the Revised Code. (2) The court shall impose a mandatory prison term on an offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of division (A)(2) or (3)(a) of this section or a felony violation of division (A)(3)(b) of this section if either division (E)(2)(a) or (b) of this section applies. The mandatory prison term shall be a definite term from the range of prison terms provided in division (A)(3)(a) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code for a felony of the third degree or from division (A)(4) of that section for a felony of the fourth degree, whichever is applicable. The court shall impose a mandatory prison term on an offender in a category described in this division if either of the following applies: (a) The offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of this section or section 2903.08 of the Revised Code. (b) At the time of the offense, the offender was driving under suspension or cancellation under Chapter 4510. or any other provision of the Revised Code or was operating a motor vehicle or motorcycle, did not have a valid driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege, and was not eligible for renewal of the offender's driver's license or commercial driver's license without examination under section 4507.10 of the Revised Code. (F) Divisions (A)(2)(b) and (3)(b) of this section do not apply in a particular construction zone unless signs of the type described in section 2903.081 of the Revised Code are erected in that construction zone in accordance with the guidelines and design specifications established by the director of transportation under section 5501.27 of the Revised Code. The failure to erect signs of the type described in section 2903.081 of the Revised Code in a particular construction zone in accordance with those guidelines and design specifications does not limit or affect the application of division (A)(1), (A)(2)(a), (A)(2)(c), (A)(3)(a), or (A)(4) of this section in that construction zone or the prosecution of any person who violates any of those divisions in that construction zone. (G)(1) As used in this section: (a) "Mandatory prison term" and "mandatory jail term" have the same meanings as in section 2929.01 of the Revised Code. (b) "Traffic-related homicide, manslaughter, or assault offense" means a violation of section 2903.04 of the Revised Code in circumstances in which division (D) of that section applies, a violation of section 2903.06 or 2903.08 of the Revised Code, or a violation of section 2903.06, 2903.07, or 2903.08 of the Revised Code as they existed prior to March 23, 2000. (c) "Construction zone" has the same meaning as in section 5501.27 of the Revised Code. (d) "Reckless operation offense" means a violation of section 4511.20 of the Revised Code or a municipal ordinance substantially equivalent to section 4511.20 of the Revised Code. (e) "Speeding offense" means a violation of section 4511.21 of the Revised Code or a municipal ordinance pertaining to speed. (f) "Traffic-related murder, felonious assault, or attempted murder offense" means a violation of section 2903.01 or 2903.02 of the Revised Code in circumstances in which the offender used a motor vehicle as the means to commit the violation, a violation of division (A)(2) of section 2903.11 of the Revised Code in circumstances in which the deadly weapon used in the commission of the violation is a motor vehicle, or an attempt to commit aggravated murder or murder in violation of section 2923.02 of the Revised Code in circumstances in which the offender used a motor vehicle as the means to attempt to commit the aggravated murder or murder. (g) "Motor vehicle," "mini-truck," and "utility vehicle" have the same meanings as in section 4501.01 of the Revised Code. (h) "OVI offense" means a violation of division (A) of section 4511.19 of the Revised Code, a violation of division (A) of section 1547.11 of the Revised Code, a violation of division (A)(3) of section 4561.15 of the Revised Code, or a substantially equivalent municipal ordinance. (2) For the purposes of this section, when a penalty or suspension is enhanced because of a prior or current violation of a specified law or a prior or current specified offense, the reference to the violation of the specified law or the specified offense includes any violation of any substantially equivalent municipal ordinance, former law of this state, or current or former law of another state or the United States. Sec. 2903.08. (A) No person, while operating or participating in the operation of a motor vehicle, motorcycle, utility vehicle, mini-truck, snowmobile, locomotive, watercraft, or aircraft, shall cause serious physical harm to another person or another's unborn in any of the following ways: (1)(a) As the proximate result of committing a violation of division (A) of section 4511.19 of the Revised Code or of a substantially equivalent municipal ordinance; (b) As the proximate result of committing a violation of division (A) of section 1547.11 of the Revised Code or of a substantially equivalent municipal ordinance; (c) As the proximate result of committing a violation of division (A)(3) of section 4561.15 of the Revised Code or of a substantially equivalent municipal ordinance. (2) In one of the following ways: (a) As the proximate result of committing, while operating or participating in the operation of a motor vehicle, utility vehicle, mini-truck, or motorcycle in a construction zone, a reckless operation offense, provided that this division applies only if the person to whom the serious physical harm is caused or to whose unborn the serious physical harm is caused is in the construction zone at the time of the offender's commission of the reckless operation offense in the construction zone and does not apply as described in division (E) of this section; (b) Recklessly; (c) As the proximate result of committing a violation of division (C) of section 4511.461 of the Revised Code. (3) As the proximate result of committing, while operating or participating in the operation of a motor vehicle, utility vehicle, mini-truck, or motorcycle in a construction zone, a speeding offense, provided that this division applies only if the person to whom the serious physical harm is caused or to whose unborn the serious physical harm is caused is in the construction zone at the time of the offender's commission of the speeding offense in the construction zone and does not apply as described in division (E) of this section. (B)(1) Whoever violates division (A)(1) of this section is guilty of aggravated vehicular assault. Except as otherwise provided in this division, aggravated vehicular assault is a felony of the third degree. Aggravated vehicular assault is a felony of the second degree if any of the following apply: (a) At the time of the offense, the offender was driving under a suspension imposed under Chapter 4510. or any other provision of the Revised Code. (b) The offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of this section. (c) The offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any traffic-related homicide, manslaughter, or assault offense. (d) The offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to three or more prior violations of division (A) of section 4511.19 of the Revised Code or a substantially equivalent municipal ordinance within the previous ten years. (e) The offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to three or more prior violations of division (A) of section 1547.11 of the Revised Code or of a substantially equivalent municipal ordinance within the previous ten years. (f) The offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to three or more prior violations of division (A)(3) of section 4561.15 of the Revised Code or of a substantially equivalent municipal ordinance within the previous ten years. (g) The offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to three or more prior violations of any combination of the offenses listed in division (B)(1)(d), (e), or (f) of this section. (h) The offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a second or subsequent felony violation of division (A) of section 4511.19 of the Revised Code. (2) In addition to any other sanctions imposed pursuant to division (B)(1) of this section, except as otherwise provided in this division, the court shall impose upon the offender a class three suspension of the offender's driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege from the range specified in division (A)(3) of section 4510.02 of the Revised Code. If the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of this section, any traffic-related homicide, manslaughter, or assault offense, or any traffic-related murder, felonious assault, or attempted murder offense, the court shall impose either a class two suspension of the offender's driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege from the range specified in division (A)(2) of that section or a class one suspension as specified in division (A)(1) of that section. (C)(1) Whoever violates division (A)(2) or (3) of this section is guilty of vehicular assault and shall be punished as provided in divisions (C)(2) and (3) of this section. (2) Except as otherwise provided in this division, vehicular assault committed in violation of division (A)(2) of this section is a felony of the fourth degree. Vehicular assault committed in violation of division (A)(2) of this section is a felony of the third degree if, at the time of the offense, the offender was driving under a suspension imposed under Chapter 4510. or any other provision of the Revised Code, if the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of this section or any traffic-related homicide, manslaughter, or assault offense, or if, in the same course of conduct that resulted in the violation of division (A)(2) of this section, the offender also violated section 4549.02, 4549.021, or 4549.03 of the Revised Code. In addition to any other sanctions imposed, the court shall impose upon the offender a class four suspension of the offender's driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege from the range specified in division (A)(4) of section 4510.02 of the Revised Code or, if the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of this section, any traffic-related homicide, manslaughter, or assault offense, or any traffic-related murder, felonious assault, or attempted murder offense, a class three suspension of the offender's driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege from the range specified in division (A)(3) of that section. (3) Except as otherwise provided in this division, vehicular assault committed in violation of division (A)(3) of this section is a misdemeanor of the first degree. Vehicular assault committed in violation of division (A)(3) of this section is a felony of the fourth degree if, at the time of the offense, the offender was driving under a suspension imposed under Chapter 4510. or any other provision of the Revised Code or if the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of this section or any traffic-related homicide, manslaughter, or assault offense. In addition to any other sanctions imposed, the court shall impose upon the offender a class four suspension of the offender's driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege from the range specified in division (A)(4) of section 4510.02 of the Revised Code or, if the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of this section, any traffic-related homicide, manslaughter, or assault offense, or any traffic-related murder, felonious assault, or attempted murder offense, a class three suspension of the offender's driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege from the range specified in division (A)(3) of section 4510.02 of the Revised Code. (D)(1) The court shall impose a mandatory prison term, as described in division (D)(4) of this section, on an offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of division (A)(1) of this section. (2) The court shall impose a mandatory prison term, as described in division (D)(4) of this section, on an offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of division (A)(2) of this section or a felony violation of division (A)(3) of this section if either of the following applies: (a) The offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of this section or section 2903.06 of the Revised Code. (b) At the time of the offense, the offender was driving under suspension under Chapter 4510. or any other provision of the Revised Code. (3) The court shall impose a mandatory jail term of at least seven days on an offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a misdemeanor violation of division (A)(3) of this section and may impose upon the offender a longer jail term as authorized pursuant to section 2929.24 of the Revised Code. (4) A mandatory prison term required under division (D)(1) or (2) of this section shall be a definite term from the range of prison terms provided in division (A)(2)(b) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code for a felony of the second degree, from division (A)(3)(a) of that section for a felony of the third degree, or from division (A)(4) of that section for a felony of the fourth degree, whichever is applicable, except that if the violation is a felony of the second degree committed on or after March 22, 2019, the court shall impose as the minimum prison term for the offense a mandatory prison term that is one of the minimum terms prescribed for a felony of the second degree in division (A)(2)(a) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code. (E) Divisions (A)(2)(a) and (3) of this section do not apply in a particular construction zone unless signs of the type described in section 2903.081 of the Revised Code are erected in that construction zone in accordance with the guidelines and design specifications established by the director of transportation under section 5501.27 of the Revised Code. The failure to erect signs of the type described in section 2903.081 of the Revised Code in a particular construction zone in accordance with those guidelines and design specifications does not limit or affect the application of division (A)(1) or , (2)(b), or (2)(c) of this section in that construction zone or the prosecution of any person who violates either of those divisions in that construction zone. (F) As used in this section: (1) "Mandatory prison term" and "mandatory jail term" have the same meanings as in section 2929.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Traffic-related homicide, manslaughter, or assault offense" and "traffic-related murder, felonious assault, or attempted murder offense" have the same meanings as in section 2903.06 of the Revised Code. (3) "Construction zone" has the same meaning as in section 5501.27 of the Revised Code. (4) "Reckless operation offense" and "speeding offense" have the same meanings as in section 2903.06 of the Revised Code. (G) For the purposes of this section, when a penalty or suspension is enhanced because of a prior or current violation of a specified law or a prior or current specified offense, the reference to the violation of the specified law or the specified offense includes any violation of any substantially equivalent municipal ordinance, former law of this state, or current or former law of another state or the United States. Sec. 2903.081. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Construction zone" has the same meaning as in section 5501.27 of the Revised Code. (2) "Reckless operation offense" and "speeding offense" have the same meanings as in section 2903.06 of the Revised Code. (B) The director of transportation, board of county commissioners, or board of township trustees shall cause signs to be erected in construction zones notifying motorists of the prohibitions set forth in sections 2903.06 and 2903.08 of the Revised Code regarding the death of or injury to any person in the construction zone as a proximate result of a reckless operation offense or speeding offense in the construction zone. The prohibitions set forth in divisions (A)(2)(b) and (3)(b) of section 2903.06 and divisions (A)(2)(a) and (3) of section 2903.08 of the Revised Code apply to persons who commit a reckless operation offense or speeding offense in a particular construction zone only when signs of that nature are erected in that construction zone in accordance with the guidelines and design specifications established by the director under section 5501.27 of the Revised Code. The failure to erect signs of that nature in a particular construction zone in accordance with those guidelines and design specifications does not limit or affect the application of division (A)(1), (A)(2)(a), (A)(2)(c), (A)(3)(a), or (A)(4) of section 2903.06 or division (A)(1) or , (2)(b), or (2)(c) of section 2903.08 of the Revised Code in that construction zone or the prosecution of any person who violates either of those divisions in that construction zone. Sec. 2903.13. (A) No person shall knowingly cause or attempt to cause physical harm to another or to another's unborn. (B) No person shall recklessly cause serious physical harm to another or to another's unborn. (C)(1) Whoever violates this section is guilty of assault, and the court shall sentence the offender as provided in this division and divisions (C)(1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), and (10) of this section. Except as otherwise provided in division (C)(2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), or (9) of this section, assault is a misdemeanor of the first degree. (2) Except as otherwise provided in this division, if the offense is committed by a caretaker against a person with a functional impairment under the caretaker's care, assault is a felony of the fourth degree. If the offense is committed by a caretaker against a person with a functional impairment under the caretaker's care, if the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of this section or section 2903.11 or 2903.16 of the Revised Code, and if in relation to the previous conviction the offender was a caretaker and the victim was a person with a functional impairment under the offender's care, assault is a felony of the third degree. (3) If the offense occurs in or on the grounds of a state correctional institution or an institution of the department of youth services, the victim of the offense is an employee of the department of rehabilitation and correction or the department of youth services, and the offense is committed by a person incarcerated in the state correctional institution or by a person institutionalized in the department of youth services institution pursuant to a commitment to the department of youth services, assault is a felony of the third degree. (4) If the offense is committed in any of the following circumstances, assault is a felony of the fifth degree: (a) The offense occurs in or on the grounds of a local correctional facility, the victim of the offense is an employee of the local correctional facility or a probation department or is on the premises of the facility for business purposes or as a visitor, and the offense is committed by a person who is under custody in the facility subsequent to the person's arrest for any crime or delinquent act, subsequent to the person's being charged with or convicted of any crime, or subsequent to the person's being alleged to be or adjudicated a delinquent child. (b) The offense occurs off the grounds of a state correctional institution and off the grounds of an institution of the department of youth services, the victim of the offense is an employee of the department of rehabilitation and correction, the department of youth services, or a probation department, the offense occurs during the employee's official work hours and while the employee is engaged in official work responsibilities, and the offense is committed by a person incarcerated in a state correctional institution or institutionalized in the department of youth services who temporarily is outside of the institution for any purpose, by a parolee, by an offender under transitional control, under a community control sanction, or on an escorted visit, by a person under post-release control, or by an offender under any other type of supervision by a government agency. (c) The offense occurs off the grounds of a local correctional facility, the victim of the offense is an employee of the local correctional facility or a probation department, the offense occurs during the employee's official work hours and while the employee is engaged in official work responsibilities, and the offense is committed by a person who is under custody in the facility subsequent to the person's arrest for any crime or delinquent act, subsequent to the person being charged with or convicted of any crime, or subsequent to the person being alleged to be or adjudicated a delinquent child and who temporarily is outside of the facility for any purpose or by a parolee, by an offender under transitional control, under a community control sanction, or on an escorted visit, by a person under post-release control, or by an offender under any other type of supervision by a government agency. (d) The victim of the offense is a school teacher or administrator, school crossing guard performing official duties, or a school bus operator, and the offense occurs in a school, on school premises, in a school building, on a school bus, in a crosswalk or sidewalk that is in or adjacent to a school zone, or while the victim is outside of school premises or a school bus and is engaged in duties or official responsibilities associated with the victim's employment or position as a school teacher or administrator or a school bus operator, including, but not limited to, driving, accompanying, or chaperoning students at or on class or field trips, athletic events, or other school extracurricular activities or functions outside of school premises. (5) If the assault is committed in any of the following circumstances, assault is a felony of the fourth degree: (a) The victim of the offense is a peace officer or an investigator of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation, a firefighter, or a person performing emergency medical service, while in the performance of the officer's, investigator's, firefighter's, or person's official duties. (b) The victim of the offense is an emergency service responder, the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is an emergency service responder, and it is the offender's specific purpose to commit the offense against an emergency service responder. (c) The victim of the offense is a family or household member or co-worker of a person who is an emergency service responder, the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a family or household member or co-worker of an emergency service responder, and it is the offender's specific purpose to commit the offense against a family or household member or co-worker of an emergency service responder. (6) If the offense is a felony of the fourth degree under division (C)(5)(a) of this section, if the victim of the offense is a peace officer or an investigator of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation, and if the victim suffered serious physical harm as a result of the commission of the offense, the court, pursuant to division (F) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code, shall impose as a mandatory prison term one of the prison terms prescribed for a felony of the fourth degree that is at least twelve months in duration. (7) If the victim of the offense is an officer or employee of a public children services agency or a private child placing agency and the offense relates to the officer's or employee's performance or anticipated performance of official responsibilities or duties, assault is either a felony of the fifth degree or, if the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to an offense of violence, the victim of that prior offense was an officer or employee of a public children services agency or private child placing agency, and that prior offense related to the officer's or employee's performance or anticipated performance of official responsibilities or duties, a felony of the fourth degree. (8) If the victim of the offense is a health care professional of a hospital, a health care worker of a hospital, or a security officer of a hospital whom the offender knows or has reasonable cause to know is a health care professional of a hospital, a health care worker of a hospital, or a security officer of a hospital, if the victim is engaged in the performance of the victim's duties, and if the hospital offers de-escalation or crisis intervention training for such professionals, workers, or officers, assault is one of the following: (a) Except as otherwise provided in division (C)(8)(b) of this section, assault committed in the specified circumstances is a misdemeanor of the first degree. Notwithstanding the fine specified in division (A)(2)(a) of section 2929.28 of the Revised Code for a misdemeanor of the first degree, in sentencing the offender under this division and if the court decides to impose a fine, the court may impose upon the offender a fine of not more than five thousand dollars. (b) If the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one or more assault or homicide offenses committed against hospital personnel, assault committed in the specified circumstances is a felony of the fifth degree. (9) If the victim of the offense is a judge, magistrate, prosecutor, or court official or employee whom the offender knows or has reasonable cause to know is a judge, magistrate, prosecutor, or court official or employee, and if the victim is engaged in the performance of the victim's duties, assault is one of the following: (a) Except as otherwise provided in division (C)(9)(b) of this section, assault committed in the specified circumstances is a misdemeanor of the first degree. In sentencing the offender under this division, if the court decides to impose a fine, notwithstanding the fine specified in division (A)(2)(a) of section 2929.28 of the Revised Code for a misdemeanor of the first degree, the court may impose upon the offender a fine of not more than five thousand dollars. (b) If the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one or more assault or homicide offenses committed against justice system personnel, assault committed in the specified circumstances is a felony of the fifth degree. (10) If an offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to assault when it is a misdemeanor also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification as described in section 2941.1423 of the Revised Code that was included in the indictment, count in the indictment, or information charging the offense, the court shall sentence the offender to a mandatory jail term as provided in division (F) of section 2929.24 of the Revised Code. If an offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to assault when it is a felony also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification as described in section 2941.1423 of the Revised Code that was included in the indictment, count in the indictment, or information charging the offense, except as otherwise provided in division (C)(6) of this section, the court shall sentence the offender to a mandatory prison term as provided in division (B)(8) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code. (D) A prosecution for a violation of this section does not preclude a prosecution of a violation of any other section of the Revised Code. One or more acts, a series of acts, or a course of behavior that can be prosecuted under this section or any other section of the Revised Code may be prosecuted under this section, the other section of the Revised Code, or both sections. However, if an offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of this section and also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of section 2903.22 of the Revised Code based on the same conduct involving the same victim that was the basis of the violation of this section, the two offenses are allied offenses of similar import under section 2941.25 of the Revised Code. (E) As used in this section: (1) "Peace officer" has the same meaning as in section 2935.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Firefighter" means any person who is a firefighter as defined in section 3937.41 of the Revised Code and, for purposes of division (E)(21) of this section, also includes a member of a fire department as defined in section 742.01 of the Revised Code. (3) "Emergency medical service" has the same meaning as in section 4765.01 of the Revised Code. (4) "Local correctional facility" means a county, multicounty, municipal, municipal-county, or multicounty-municipal jail or workhouse, a minimum security jail established under section 341.23 or 753.21 of the Revised Code, or another county, multicounty, municipal, municipal-county, or multicounty-municipal facility used for the custody of persons arrested for any crime or delinquent act, persons charged with or convicted of any crime, or persons alleged to be or adjudicated a delinquent child. (5) "Employee of a local correctional facility" means a person who is an employee of the political subdivision or of one or more of the affiliated political subdivisions that operates the local correctional facility and who operates or assists in the operation of the facility. (6) "School teacher or administrator" means either of the following: (a) A person who is employed in the public schools of the state under a contract described in section 3311.77 or 3319.08 of the Revised Code in a position in which the person is required to have a certificate issued pursuant to sections 3319.22 to 3319.311 of the Revised Code. (b) A person who is employed by a nonpublic school for which the director of education and workforce prescribes minimum standards under section 3301.07 of the Revised Code and who is certificated in accordance with section 3301.071 of the Revised Code. (7) "Community control sanction" has the same meaning as in section 2929.01 of the Revised Code. (8) "Escorted visit" means an escorted visit granted under section 2967.27 of the Revised Code. (9) "Post-release control" and "transitional control" have the same meanings as in section 2967.01 of the Revised Code. (10) "Investigator of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation" has the same meaning as in section 2903.11 of the Revised Code. (11) "Health care professional" and "health care worker" have the same meanings as in section 2305.234 of the Revised Code. (12) "Assault or homicide offense committed against hospital personnel" means a violation of this section or of section 2903.01, 2903.02, 2903.03, 2903.04, 2903.041, 2903.11, 2903.12, or 2903.14 of the Revised Code committed in circumstances in which all of the following apply: (a) The victim of the offense was a health care professional of a hospital, a health care worker of a hospital, or a security officer of a hospital. (b) The offender knew or had reasonable cause to know that the victim was a health care professional of a hospital, a health care worker of a hospital, or a security officer of a hospital. (c) The victim was engaged in the performance of the victim's duties. (d) The hospital offered de-escalation or crisis intervention training for such professionals, workers, or officers. (13) "De-escalation or crisis intervention training" means de-escalation or crisis intervention training for health care professionals of a hospital, health care workers of a hospital, and security officers of a hospital to facilitate interaction with patients, members of a patient's family, and visitors, including those with mental impairments. (14) "Assault or homicide offense committed against justice system personnel" means a violation of this section or of section 2903.01, 2903.02, 2903.03, 2903.04, 2903.041, 2903.11, 2903.12, or 2903.14 of the Revised Code committed in circumstances in which the victim of the offense was a judge, magistrate, prosecutor, or court official or employee whom the offender knew or had reasonable cause to know was a judge, magistrate, prosecutor, or court official or employee, and the victim was engaged in the performance of the victim's duties. (15) "Court official or employee" means any official or employee of a court created under the constitution or statutes of this state or of a United States court located in this state. (16) "Judge" means a judge of a court created under the constitution or statutes of this state or of a United States court located in this state. (17) "Magistrate" means an individual who is appointed by a court of record of this state and who has the powers and may perform the functions specified in Civil Rule 53, Criminal Rule 19, or Juvenile Rule 40, or an individual who is appointed by a United States court located in this state who has similar powers and functions. (18) "Prosecutor" has the same meaning as in section 2935.01 of the Revised Code. (19)(a) "Hospital" means, subject to division (E)(19)(b) of this section, an institution classified as a hospital under section 3701.01 of the Revised Code in which are provided to patients diagnostic, medical, surgical, obstetrical, psychiatric, or rehabilitation care or a hospital operated by a health maintenance organization. (b) "Hospital" does not include any of the following: (i) A facility licensed under Chapter 3721. of the Revised Code, a health care facility operated by the department of mental health and addiction services behavioral health or the department of developmental disabilities, a health maintenance organization that does not operate a hospital, or the office of any private, licensed health care professional, whether organized for individual or group practice; (ii) An institution for the sick that is operated exclusively for patients who use spiritual means for healing and for whom the acceptance of medical care is inconsistent with their religious beliefs, accredited by a national accrediting organization, exempt from federal income taxation under section 501 of the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986," 100 Stat. 2085, 26 U.S.C. 1, as amended, and providing twenty-four-hour nursing care pursuant to the exemption in division (E) of section 4723.32 of the Revised Code from the licensing requirements of Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code. (20) "Health maintenance organization" has the same meaning as in section 3727.01 of the Revised Code. (21) "Emergency service responder" means any law enforcement officer, first responder, emergency medical technician-basic, emergency medical technician-intermediate, emergency medical technician-paramedic, firefighter, or volunteer firefighter. (22) "Family or household member" means any of the following: (a) Any of the following who is residing or has resided with a person who is employed as an emergency service responder: (i) A spouse, a person living as a spouse, or a former spouse of a person who is employed as an emergency service responder; (ii) A parent, a foster parent, or a child of a person who is employed as an emergency service responder, or another person related by consanguinity or affinity to a person who is employed as an emergency service responder; (iii) A parent or a child of a spouse, person living as a spouse, or former spouse of a person who is employed as an emergency service responder, or another person related by consanguinity or affinity to a spouse, person living as a spouse, or former spouse of a person who is employed as an emergency service responder. (b) The natural parent of any child of whom a person who is employed as an emergency service responder is the other natural parent or is the putative other natural parent. (23) "First responder," "emergency medical technician-basic," "emergency medical technician-intermediate," and "emergency medical technician-paramedic" have the same meanings as in section 4765.01 of the Revised Code. (24) "Volunteer firefighter" has the same meaning as in section 146.01 of the Revised Code. (25) "Person living as a spouse" means a person who is living or has lived with a person who is employed as an emergency service responder in a common law marital relationship, who otherwise is cohabiting with a person who is employed as an emergency service responder, or who otherwise has cohabited with a person who is employed as an emergency service responder within five years prior to the date of the alleged commission of the act in question. (26) "Co-worker" means a person who is employed by the organization or entity that is served by a person who is employed as an emergency service responder. (27) "School crossing guard performing official duties" means a formally designated school crossing guard acting in accordance with division (B) of section 4511.461 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4511.461. (A) As used in this section: (1) "School crossing guard" means a person formally designated by a school district, municipality, township, or law enforcement agency to direct traffic through a crosswalk while pedestrians are going to or leaving school during the opening or closing hours. (2) "Official duties" means the actions taken by a school crossing guard while wearing or displaying high-visibility apparel or using a stop paddle, a whistle, or specific hand movements as a means to clearly direct traffic in or near a crosswalk. (3) "School zone" has the same meaning as in section 4511.21 of the Revised Code. (4) "Lawful order" means a command given within the scope of the authority granted by statute while the person giving the command is performing official duties. (B) A school crossing guard, while performing official duties, may direct, stop, or otherwise control traffic in order to ensure the safety of a pedestrian using a crosswalk. (C)(1) No person shall knowingly fail to obey a lawful order given by a school crossing guard while the school crossing guard is performing official duties. (2) No person shall knowingly harass, threaten, intimidate, or interfere with a school crossing guard while the school crossing guard is performing official duties. (D) Whoever violates division (C) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor in the first degree. (E) Notwithstanding division (D) of this section, if the offender was in a school zone at the time of the violation during the hours in which the school zone speed limit was in effect, the court, in addition to all other penalties provided by law, shall impose upon the offender a fine of two times the usual amount imposed for the violation. (F) In addition to all other penalties provided by law, points shall be assessed for a violation of division (C) of this section in accordance with section 4510.036 of the Revised Code. (G)(1) Except as provided in division (G)(2) of this section, a school crossing guard is immune from liability in a civil action to recover damages for injury, death, or loss to person or property allegedly caused by an act or omission in connection with a power, duty, responsibility, or authorization granted to the school crossing guard under this section. (2) The immunity described in division (G)(1) of this section does not apply to a school crossing guard if, in relation to the act or omission in question, any of the following applies: (a) The act or omission was manifestly outside the scope of the school crossing guard's official duties. (b) The act or omission was with malicious purpose, in bad faith, or in a wanton or reckless manner. (c) Liability for the act or omission is expressly imposed by another provision of the Revised Code. Section 2. That existing sections 2903.06, 2903.08, 2903.081, and 2903.13 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed.